Tennessee, session 114, SB2177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations
(TACIR) shall conduct a study of the salaries and other benefits paid to state and local law
enforcement officers in this state. The study must include:
(1) Analysis of how current salaries and benefits paid to state and local law
enforcement officers affect recruitment, staffing, and retention, particularly in smaller city
and county departments, and evaluate potential alternatives for improvement; and
(2) Analysis of how state salary increases and adjustments for state law
enforcement officers affect recruitment, staffing, and retention of local law enforcement
officers.
SECTION 2. TACIR shall publish a report of its findings and recommendations and
deliver a copy of the report to the governor, the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house
of representatives, and the legislative librarian no later than January 31, 2027. The report may
be delivered electronically.
SECTION 3. TACIR may request information and input from other appropriate state and
local governmental entities, as necessary, and such entities shall comply with TACIR's request.
The study must be conducted from TACIR's existing resources.
SECTION 4. As used in this act:
(1) "Local law enforcement officer" means a full-time, salaried employee of a
political subdivision who is a sheriff, sheriff's deputy, police officer, chief of police, or
SB2177
009961
- 1 -

other law enforcement officer whose primary responsibility is the prevention and
detection of crime and apprehension of offenders, or who is a correctional officer with
the political subdivision; and
(2) "State law enforcement officer" means a full-time, salaried employee of the
state who is a commissioned member of the department of safety, an agent of the
Tennessee bureau of investigation, a commissioned employee of the wildlife resources
agency engaged in law enforcement activities on a day-to-day basis, a commissioned
member of the alcoholic beverage commission who is engaged in law enforcement
activities on a day-to-day basis, or a correctional officer vested with the powers of a law
enforcement officer by the commissioner of correction.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009961